Idaho, session 2025, H0386.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 31-131, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
31-131. LATAH COUNTY. Latah county is described as follows: beginning
at a point where the middle line of township thirty-seven (37) north inter-
sects the boundary line between the state of Idaho and the state of Washing-
ton;
Western boundary. Thence north along the said boundary line to a point
where the watershed between Hangman's creek and Palouse river crosses the
said boundary line;
Northern boundary. Thence in a southeasterly direction along the said
watershed to a point where this line crosses the section line between sec-
tions twenty-seven (27) and twenty-eight (28), township forty-three (43)
north, range four (4) west; thence south on the said section line to the
section corner common to sections twenty-seven (27), twenty-eight (28),
thirty-three (33) and thirty-four (34), in the same township and range;
thence east on this section line to the eastern boundary of the said town-
ship and range; thence north on the range line to the northwest corner of
section thirty-one (31), township forty-three (43) north, range three (3)
west; thence east along the section line running on the north of said section
thirty-one (31), to the northeast corner of section thirty-three (33), town-
ship forty-three (43) north, range one (1) west; thence south one (1) mile,
to the township line between townships forty-two (42) and forty-three (43)
north; thence east along the said township line approximately 6 miles to the
northeast corner of section four (4), township forty-two (42) north, range
one (1) east, being the northeast corner of Latah county with Benewah county
to the north and Shoshone county to the east;
Eastern boundary. Thence south along the section lines, approximately
2 miles to the southeast corner of section nine (9), township forty-two (42)
north, range one (1) east;
Thence east along the section line, approximately 1 half mile to the
north quarter corner of section fifteen (15), township forty-two (42) north,
range one (1) east;
Thence south along the midsection line, approximately 2 miles to the
south quarter corner of section twenty-two (22), township forty-two (42)
north, range one (1) east;


Thence west along the section line, approximately 1 quarter mile to the
west sixteenth corner of sections twenty-two (22) and twenty-seven (27),
township forty-two (42) north, range one (1) east;
Thence west along the section line, 90 feet to a duly surveyed property
corner monument;
Thence south along the property line, approximately 1 half mile to a
duly surveyed property corner monument;
Thence east along the section subdivision line, 90 feet to the center
west sixteenth corner of section twenty-seven (27);
Thence south along sixteenth section subdivision lines, approximately
1 and 1 half miles to the west sixteenth corner of sections thirty-four (34)
and three (3), township forty-two (42) north and township forty-one (41)
north, range one (1) east, being the southwest corner of Shoshone county with
Latah county to west and south;
Thence east along the township line, approximately 1 quarter mile to the
north quarter corner of section three (3), township forty-one (41) north,
range one (1) east, being the northwest corner of Clearwater county with
Shoshone county to the north and Latah county to the west;
Thence south along midsection lines, approximately 6 miles to the south
quarter corner of section thirty-four (34), township forty-one (41) north,
range one (1) east;
Thence west along the township line, approximately 22.8 chains (1,505
feet) to the west sixteenth corner of section three (3), township forty (40)
north, range one (1) east;
Thence south along sixteenth section subdivision lines, approximately
1 mile to the west sixteenth corner of sections three (3) and ten (10), town-
ship forty (40) north, range one (1) east;
Thence west along the section line, 90 feet to a duly surveyed property
corner monument;
Thence south along the property line, approximately 1 quarter mile to a
duly surveyed property corner monument;
Thence east along the section subdivision line, 90 feet to the northwest
sixteenth corner of section ten (10), township forty (40) north, range one
(1) east;
Thence south along sixteenth section subdivision lines, approximately
4 and 3 quarter miles to the west sixteenth corner of sections thirty-four
(34) and three (3), townships forty (40) north and thirty-nine (39) north,
range one (1) east;
Thence west along the township line, approximately 90 feet to an unmonu-
mented property corner;
Thence south approximately 1 half mile to a duly surveyed property cor-
ner monument;
Thence south approximately 1 half mile to a duly surveyed property cor-
ner on the south line of section three (3), township thirty-nine (39), range
one (1) east;
Thence west along the section line approximately 1230 feet to the north-
east corner of section nine (9), township thirty-nine (39) north, range one
(1) east;


Thence south along section lines, approximately 5 miles to the south-
east corner of section thirty-three (33), township thirty-nine (39) north,
range one (1) east;
Thence east along the township line, approximately 5.83 chains (385
feet) to the northeast corner of section four (4), township thirty-eight
(38) north, range one (1) east;
Thence south along section lines, approximately 3 miles to the middle
line of the township, and the southeast corner of section sixteen (16), town-
ship thirty-eight (38) north, range one (1) east, being the southeast corner
of Latah county with Clearwater county to the east and south;
Southern boundary. Thence west on the middle line of township
thirty-eight (38) north to the point of intersection of said middle line and
the center of Big Potlatch creek; thence along the average center of said
creek south 41°29'00" west 433.17 feet; thence south 83°01'30" west 555.76
feet; thence north 72°43'45" west 486.51 feet; thence north 41°28'30" west
762.95 feet; thence north 72°52'00" west 134.45 feet; to a point which is
north 358.29 feet from the corner common to Sections 16, 17, 20 and 21, town-
ship thirty-eight (38) north, range 2 west, Boise Meridian; thence north
72°52'00" west 2007.63 feet; thence south 48°22'30" west 949.70 feet; thence
north 88°25'15" west 1485.48 feet; thence south 45°57'45" west 770.90 feet;
thence north 82°46'15" west 750.35 feet; thence south 43°28'45" west 1160.84
feet; thence south 65°32'00" west 804.18 feet; thence south 46°29'30" west
527.72 feet; thence south 53°01'15" west 717.00 feet; to a point which is
south 2073.86 feet from the one-quarter corner common to Sections 18 and 19
township thirty-eight (38) north, range 2 west, Boise Meridian; thence south
53°01'15" west 685.19 feet; thence south 30°54'30" west 1373.34 feet; thence
south 84°44'45" west 1151.76 feet; thence south 21°04'00" east 1132.26 feet;
thence south 05°04'00" west 902.41 feet; thence south 78°56'15" west 493.86
feet; to a point which is south 657.49 feet from the corner common to Sections
24, 19, 31 and 25, township thirty-eight (38) north, range 3 west and range
2 west, Boise Meridian; thence south 78°56'15" west 136.97 feet; thence
north 87°54'15" west 2370.65 feet; thence south 73°27'15" west 1216.03 feet;
thence south 34°56'45" west 2443.32 feet; thence south 55°35'15" west 258.89
feet; to a point which is south 447.50 feet from the one-quarter corner com-
mon to Sections 26 and 25, township thirty-eight (38) north, range 3 west,
Boise Meridian; thence south 55°35'15" west 2071.08 feet; thence south
42°55'30" west 1609.29 feet; to a point which is located west 2811.85 feet
from the corner common to Sections 26, 25, 36 and 35, township thirty-eight
(38) north, range 3 west, Boise Meridian; thence south 44°33'29" west 950.95
feet; thence south 07°36'44" west 869.85 feet; thence south 28°34'42" west
740.46 feet; thence south 30°26'40" west 397.99 feet; thence south 03°38'57"
west 618.32 feet; thence south 38°21'12" west 690.57 feet; thence south
54°22'07" west 56.90 feet; thence south 69°39'54" west 343.03 feet; thence
south 82°19'22" west 333.65 feet; thence south 65°55'57" west 647.97 feet;
thence south 63°14'18" west 784.25 feet; thence north 85°46'49" west 1140.68
feet; thence south 37°18'55" west 820.62 feet; thence south 30°42'01"
west 840.83 feet; thence south 02°55'30" east 1395.50 feet; thence south
10°47'35" west 233.84 feet; thence south 52°26'42" west 474.82 feet; thence
south 31°23'33" west 1307.49 feet; thence south 15°45'00" west 732.84 feet;
thence south 10°27'38" east 755.37 feet; to a point which is east 662.51


feet and north 02°06'09" west 8.57 feet from the corner common to Sections
3, 4, 9 and 10, township thirty-seven (37) north, range 3 west, Boise Merid-
ian, which corner is marked by a Brass Cap Monument set 1556.70 feet east of
said corner set by James W. Grow, R.L.S. #749; thence south 02°06'09" east
317.10 feet; thence south 11°10'52" west 528.81 feet; thence south 33°23'33"
west 1343.54 feet; thence south 18°47'37" east 514.74 feet; thence south
18°33'57" west 902.43 feet; thence south 10°36'14" west 654.11 feet; thence
south 21°02'12" west 343.00 feet; thence south 31°52'33" west 896.41 feet;
to a point that is west 983.97 feet and north 05°04'43" east 80.67 feet from
the corner common to Sections 9, 10, 15 and 16, township thirty-seven (37)
north, range 3 west, Boise Meridian, being marked by a 5/8" iron pin set in a
mound of stone by James W. Grow, R.L.S. #749, and by a Brass Cap Monument set
1136.66 feet west of said section corner; thence south 05°04'43" west 488.49
feet; thence south 15°20'14" west 272.28 feet; thence south 27°52'57" west
661.93 feet; thence south 57°36'12" west 456.93 feet; thence south 21°50'14"
west 385.38 feet; thence south 12°45'28" east 367.96 feet; thence south
67°00'39" east 464.34 feet; thence south 22°07'05" west 1097.33 feet; thence
south 33°13'49" west 576.62 feet; thence south 13°03'47" east 296.08 feet;
thence south 34°16'41" west 1198.35 feet; thence south 21°36'07" west 183.18
feet; to a point on the north line of Section 21, township thirty-seven (37)
north, range 3 west, Boise Meridian, said point being east 1482.32 feet from
the northwest corner of said Section 21, which corner is marked by a Brass
Cap Monument lying east 1845.18 feet from said corner; thence west along the
middle line of township thirty-seven (37) north to the point of beginning.
County seat--Moscow.
SECTION 2. That Section 31-142, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
31-142. SHOSHONE COUNTY. Shoshone county is described as follows: be-
ginning at a point where the township line between townships forty-one (41)
and forty-two (42) north, intersects the western boundary of the state of
Montana;
Eastern boundary. Thence in a northerly direction along the said bound-
ary and with the Bitterroot range of mountains until the said range turns in a
westerly direction and is called Coeur d'Alene.
Northern boundary. Thence with the said Coeur d'Alene range of moun-
tains in a westerly direction until a point is attained on the west line of
section twenty-two (22), township fifty-four (54) north, range one (1) east,
being the northwest corner of Shoshone county with Bonner county to the north
and west;
Western boundary. Thence south along the section lines, approximately
2 and 3 quarter miles to the southwest corner of section thirty-four (34),
township fifty-four (54) north, range one (1) east;
Thence west along the township line, approximately 0.64 chains (42
feet) to the northwest corner of section three (3), township fifty-three
(53) north, range one (1) east;
Thence south along the section lines, approximately 2 miles to the
southwest corner of section ten (10), township fifty-three (53) north, range
one (1) east;


Thence east along the section line, approximately 1 half mile to the
south quarter corner of section ten (10), township fifty-three (53) north,
range one (1) east;
Thence south along the midsection lines, approximately 4 miles to the
south quarter corner of section thirty-four (34), township fifty-three (53)
north, range one (1) east, being the southeast corner of Bonner county with
Shoshone county to the south and east;
Thence west along the township line, approximately 32.24 chains (2,128
feet) to the northwest corner of section three (3), township fifty-two (52)
north, range one (1) east, being the northeast corner of Kootenai county with
Bonner county to the north and Shoshone county to the east;
Thence south along the section lines, approximately 12 miles to the
southwest corner of section thirty-four (34), township fifty-one (51)
north, range one (1) east;
Thence east along the township line, approximately 1 half mile to the
north quarter corner of section three (3), township fifty (50) north, range
one (1) east;
Thence south along the midsection lines, approximately 6 miles to the
south quarter corner of section thirty-four (34), township fifty (50) north,
range one (1) east;
Thence west along the township line, approximately 3.74 chains (247
feet) to the north quarter corner of section three (3), township forty-nine
(49) north, range one (1) east;
Thence south along the midsection lines, approximately 2 miles to the
south quarter corner of section ten (10), township forty-nine (49) north,
range one (1) east;
Thence west along the section line, approximately 1 quarter mile to the
west sixteenth corner of sections ten (10) and fifteen (15), township forty-
nine (49) north, range one (1) east;
Thence south along the sixteenth section subdivision lines, approx-
imately 4 miles to the west sixteenth corner of section thirty-four (34),
township forty-nine (49) north, range one (1) east;
Thence west along the township line, approximately 3.40 chains
(224 feet) to the west sixteenth corner of section three (3), township
forty-eight (48) north, range one (1) east;
Thence south along the sixteenth section subdivision lines, approx-
imately 5 and 1 half miles to the center west sixteenth corner of section
thirty-four (34), township forty-eight (48) north, range one (1) east;
Thence west along the section subdivision line, approximately 90 feet
to a duly surveyed property corner monument;
Thence south along the property line, approximately 1 half mile to a
duly surveyed property corner monument on the township line;
Thence east along the township line, approximately 90 feet to the west
sixteenth corner of section thirty-four (34), township forty-eight (48)
north, range one (1) east;
Thence east along the township line, approximately 1 quarter mile to the
south quarter corner of section thirty-four (34), township forty-eight (48)
north, range one (1) east;


Thence east along the township line, approximately 1.55 chains (102
feet) to the north quarter corner of section three (3), township forty-seven
(47) north, range one (1) east;
Thence south along the midsection lines, approximately 3 miles to the
south quarter corner of section fifteen (15), township forty-seven (47)
north, range one (1) east, being the southeast corner of Kootenai county with
Shoshone county to the east and south;
Thence west along the section line, approximately 1 half mile to the
northwest corner of section twenty-two (22), township forty-seven (47)
north, range one (1) east, being the northeast corner of Benewah county with
Kootenai county to the north and Shoshone county to the east;
Thence south along the section lines, approximately 2 miles to the
southwest corner of section twenty-seven (27), township forty-seven (47)
north, range one (1) east;
Thence east along the section line approximately 1 half mile to the
south quarter corner of section twenty-seven (27), township forty-seven
(47) north, range one (1) east;
Thence south along the midsection lines, approximately 4 miles to the
south quarter corner of section fifteen (15), township forty-six (46) north,
range one (1) east;
Thence west along the section line approximately 1 quarter mile to the
west sixteenth corner of section fifteen (15) and section twenty-two (22),
township forty-six (46) north, range one (1) east;
Thence south along the sixteenth section subdivision line, approxi-
mately 1 mile to the west sixteenth corner of section twenty-two (22) and
section twenty-seven (27), township forty-six (46) north, range one (1)
east;
Thence east along the section line approximately 1 quarter mile to the
north quarter corner of section twenty-seven (27), township forty-six (46)
north, range one (1) east;
Thence south along the midsection lines, approximately 2 miles to the
south quarter corner of section thirty-four (34), township forty-six (46)
north, range one (1) east;
Thence west along the township line, approximately 1 half mile to the
northwest corner of section three (3), township forty-five (45) north, range
one (1) east;
Thence south along the section lines, approximately 6 miles to the
southwest corner of section thirty-four (34), township forty-five (45)
north, range one (1) east;
Thence east along the township line, approximately 14.24 chains (940
feet) to the west sixteenth corner of section three (3), township forty-four
(44) north, range one (1) east;
Thence south along the sixteenth section subdivision lines, approxi-
mately 12 miles to the west sixteenth corner of section thirty-four (34),
township forty-three (43) north, range one (1) east, being the southeast
corner of Benewah county with Shoshone county to the east and south;
Thence west along the township line, approximately 15.50 chains (1,023
feet) to the northwest corner of section three (3), township forty-two (42)
north, range one (1) east, being the northeast corner of Latah county with
Benewah county to the north and Shoshone county to the east;


Thence south along the section lines, approximately 2 miles to the
southwest corner of section ten (10), township forty-two (42) north, range
one (1) east;
Thence east along the section line, approximately 1 half mile to the
south quarter corner of section ten (10), township forty-two (42) north,
range one (1) east;
Thence south along the midsection line, approximately 2 miles to the
south quarter corner of section twenty-two (22), township forty-two (42)
north, range one (1) east;
Thence west along the section line, approximately 1 quarter mile to the
west sixteenth corner of sections twenty-two (22) and twenty-seven (27);
Thence west along the section line, 90 feet to a duly surveyed property
corner monument;
Thence south along the property line, approximately 1 half mile to a
duly surveyed property corner monument;
Thence east along the section subdivision line, 90 feet to the center
west sixteenth corner of section twenty-seven (27);
Thence south along sixteenth section subdivision lines, approximately
1 and 1 half miles to the west sixteenth corner of sections thirty-four (34)
and three (3), township forty-two (42) north and township forty-one (41)
north, range one (1) east, being the southwest corner of Shoshone county with
Latah county to the west and Clearwater county to the south;
Southern boundary. Thence east on the said township line to the inter-
section of the same with the boundary line of the state of Montana, the place
of beginning.
County seat--Wallace.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.